Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1347.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Conveyance to the City of Hermitage, certain lands situate in the City of Hermitage, formerly known as Hickory Township, Mercer County.(a) Authorization.--The Department of General Services, with the approval of the Governor, is hereby authorized on behalf of the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania to grant and convey to the City of Hermitage, certain land and buildings situate in the City of Hermitage, formerly known as Hickory Township, Mercer County, for the fair market value of $920,000, on terms to be established in an agreement of sale.(b) Property description.--The property to be conveyed under subsection (a) consists of approximately 7.92 acres and improvements thereon, being the former Hermitage Pennsylvania 12345678910111213141516171819 National Guard Readiness Center, described as follows:All that certain portion or piece of land situate in the Township of Hickory, County of Mercer and Commonwealth of Pennsylvania, bounded and described as follows, to wit:Beginning at a point in the center line of Pennsylvania Highway Route No. 18, which point is at the northwest corner of property to be conveyed to the Hickory Township School District; thence along the center line of said highway north four degrees five minutes east (N 4° 5' E), a distance of three hundred (300) feet to a point; thence south eighty-seven degrees three and one-half minutes east (S 87° 3½' E) along land now or formerly of the Estate of J. R. Wishart, deceased, a distance of eleven hundred (1150) feet to a point; thence south four degrees five minutes west (S 4° 5' W) along land now or formerly of J. R. Wishart, deceased, a distance of three hundred (300) feet to a point on the northern boundary of land to be conveyed to the Hickory Township School District; thence along the northern boundary of said land to be conveyed to the Hickory Township School District north eighty-seven degrees three and one-half minutes west (N 87° 3½' W), a distance of eleven hundred fifty (1150) feet to a point on the center line of the aforesaid highway and the place of beginning, containing a volume of three hundred forty-five thousand (345,000) square feet of land.BEING the same property conveyed to the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania by deed of Archie Wishart and Blanche M. Wishart, executors of the Estate of J. Russell Wishart, deceased, Blanche M. Wishart, widow, Archie M. Wishart and Helen C. Wishart, husband and wife, Jessie W. Hutcheson and John A. Hutcheson, wife and husband, and Archie Wishart, Attorney-in-fact for Mary Wishart Thompson and Erich Thompson, wife and husband, dated 20260SB1347PN1744 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 September 15, 1955, and recorded on October 10, 1955, in Mercer County Deed Book "E", Volume 21, page 386.CONTAINING 7.92-acres, more or less.(c) Covenants, conditions, easements and restrictions.--(1) The conveyance shall be made under and subject to all lawful and enforceable easements, servitudes and rights of others, including, but not confined to, streets, roadways and rights of any telephone, telegraph, water, electric, gas or pipeline companies, as well as under and subject to any lawful and enforceable estates or tenancies vested in third persons appearing of record, for any portion of the land or improvements erected thereon.(2) The Secretary of General Services may include in the deed of conveyance any covenants, conditions or restrictions on the property as determined to be in the best interests of the Commonwealth.(3) The Department of General Services is authorized, on behalf of the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania, to grant any easements benefiting the property to be conveyed, or to retain any easements from the property to be conveyed, as the Secretary of General Services shall determine to be necessary or appropriate.(d) Restriction.--Any conveyance authorized under this section shall be made under and subject to the condition, which shall be contained in the deed of conveyance, that no portion of the property conveyed shall be used as a licensed facility, as defined in 4 Pa.C.S. § 1103 (relating to definitions), or any other similar type of facility authorized under State law. The condition shall be a covenant running with the land and shall be binding upon the grantee, its successors and assigns. Should the 20260SB1347PN1744 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 grantee, its successors or assigns, permit any portion of the property authorized to be conveyed in this section to be used in violation of this subsection, the title shall immediately revert to and revest in the grantor.(e) Deed of conveyance.--The conveyance shall be made by a special warranty deed to be executed by the Secretary of General Services in the name of the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania.(f) Costs and fees.--Costs and fees incidental to this conveyance shall be borne by the grantee.(g) Alternate disposition.--In the event that this conveyance is not executed within 24 months after the effective date of this subsection, the property may be disposed of by a competitive bidding process in accordance with section 2405-A of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929, as amended, except that no property disposition plan shall be required.(h) Proceeds.--The proceeds from the conveyance authorized by this section shall be deposited into the State Armory Fund.Section 2. Effective date.This act shall take effect immediately.20260SB1347PN1744 - 4 - 1234567891011121314151617181920